Utah statutes.
53A-15-105.   Dual Language Immersion Program -- Pilot.
(1)  Subject to funding for the program, the State Board of Education shall
establish a pilot program for school districts and schools to initially
participate in the Dual Language Immersion Program.
(2)  The program shall provide funds as an incentive to 15 qualifying schools
for the following languages:
(a)  six pilots for Chinese;
(b)  six pilots for Spanish;
(c)  two pilots for French; and
(d)  one pilot for Navajo.
(3)  Subject to funding for the program, a qualifying school shall:
(a)  receive up to $18,000 per year for up to six years;
(b)  establish an instructional model that uses 50% of instruction in English
and 50% of instruction in another language; and
(c)  begin the instructional model described under Subsection (3)(b) in
kindergarten or grade 1 and add an additional grade each year.
